New York, session 2025-2026, S1079.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 837-y 2 to read as follows: 3 § 837-y. Duty to intervene; violence involving incarcerated individ- 4 uals. 1. For the purposes of this section: 5 (a) "police officer" means a person designated as such in subdivision 6 thirty-four of section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law. 7 (b) "peace officer" means a person listed in section 2.10 of the crim- 8 inal procedure law. 9 2. Every police officer, peace officer and employee of a correctional 10 facility, as defined in section two of the correction law, shall be 11 required to intervene when they witness any incident of violence involv- 12 ing an incarcerated individual and another police officer, peace officer 13 or employee of a correctional facility, to stop such incident in a 14 manner conducive to keeping the peace and preventing violence, injuries 15 and/or death. 16 3. Any police officer, peace officer or employee of a correctional 17 facility who fails to intervene in violation of this section shall be 18 guilty of a class E felony. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03519-01-5